Hawaii statutes.
§201M-8 Waiver or reduction of penalties.
(a) Except where a penalty or fine is assessed pursuant to a program approved,
authorized, or delegated under a federal law, any agency authorized to assess
civil penalties or fines upon a small business shall waive or reduce any
penalty or fine as allowed by federal or state law for a violation of any
statute, ordinance, or rules by a small business under the following
conditions:

(1) The small business corrects the violation within
a minimum of thirty days after receipt of a notice of violation or citation;
and

(2) The violation was unintentional or the result of
excusable neglect; or

(3) The violation was the result of an excusable
misunderstanding of an agency's interpretation of a rule.

(b) Subsection (a) shall not apply:

(1) When a small business fails to exercise good
faith in complying with the statute or rules;

(2) When a violation involves wilful or criminal
conduct;

(3) When a violation results in serious health and
safety impacts;

(4) To violations of chapters 6E, 180, 180C, 181,
182, 183, 183C, 183D, 186, 187A, 188, 188F, 189, 190, 190D, 195, 195D, 195F,
205, 205A, 340A, 340E, 341, 342B, 342C, 342D, 342E, 342F, 342G, 342H, 342I,
342J, 342L, and 342P;

(5) To violations of sections 200-9(b) and (c),
200-24(4), 200-37, and 200-38; or

(6) To violations of administrative rules promulgated
pursuant to section [200-4(a)(6)]; except for rules pertaining to matters
listed in section [200-4(a)(6)(A), (B), (C), and (D)].

(c) An agency may adopt rules to implement the
requirements of this section. [L 1998, c 168, pt of §2, §5; am L 2002, c 202,
§5; am L 2004, c 206, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next